Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.46.120

Criminal gang intimidation.

A person commits the offense of criminal gang intimidation if the person threatens another person with bodily injury because the other person refuses to join or has attempted to withdraw from a gang, as defined in RCW 28A.600.455, if the person who threatens the victim or the victim attends or is registered in a public or alternative school. Criminal gang intimidation is a class C felony.

[ 1997 c 266 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Severability—1997 c 266: See notes following RCW 28A.600.455.